test/src/morphology/N-С_А-понятие_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - понятие M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      понятие+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: поня́тие
      понятие+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: поня́тие
      понятие+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: поня́тия
      понятие+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: поня́тии
      понятие+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: поня́тию
      понятие+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: поня́тием
      понятие+N+Neu+Pl+Nom: поня́тия
      понятие+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Inan: поня́тия
      понятие+N+Neu+Pl+Gen: поня́тий
      понятие+N+Neu+Pl+Loc: поня́тиях
      понятие+N+Neu+Pl+Dat: поня́тиям
      понятие+N+Neu+Pl+Ins: поня́тиями
